Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4336
Bonds; authorized as investments.

Bonds issued pursuant to the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act are hereby made securities in which all public officers and instrumentalities of the state and all political subdivisions, insurance companies, trust companies, banks, savings and loan associations, investment companies, personal representatives, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any officer or instrumentality of this state or any political subdivision for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of this state or any political subdivision thereof is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 36.